Hawaii statutes.
§431:9C-102 Licensure. (a) No person,
firm, association, or corporation shall act as a managing general agent, with
respect to risks located in this State for an insurer licensed in this State,
unless licensed as a producer in this State.

(b) No person, firm, association, or
corporation shall act as a managing general agent representing an insurer
domiciled in this State with respect to risks located outside this State unless
licensed as a producer in this State. [L 2002, c 155, pt of §2; am L 2003, c
212, §70; am L 2006, c 189, §7; am L 2010, c 116, §1(10)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next